Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5108
Convertible securities.

An insurer may invest in securities which are convertible into other securities if:

(1) The convertible securities are authorized under the Insurers Investment Act at the time of acquisition; and

(2) The securities into which such securities are convertible are authorized under the act at the time of conversion.

Laws 1991, LB 237, § 8.